Vermont, session 2025-2026, H182.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 122 is amended to read:
§ 122. OFFICE OF PROFESSIONAL REGULATION
The Office of Professional Regulation is created within the Office of the
Secretary of State. The Office shall have a director who shall be qualified by
education and professional experience to perform the duties of the position.
The Director of the Office of Professional Regulation shall be a classified
position with the Office of the Secretary of State. The following boards or
professions are attached to the Office of Professional Regulation:
(1) Board of Architects
VT LEG #379294 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.182
2025 Page 2 of 13
* * *
(53) Peer Recovery Support Specialists
(54) Early Childhood Educators
Sec. 2. 26 V.S.A. chapter 111 is added to read:
CHAPTER 111. EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATORS
§ 6211. CREATION OF BOARD
(a) The Vermont Board of Early Childhood Educators is created.
(b) The Board shall consist of nine members appointed for five-year terms
by the Governor pursuant to 3 V.S.A. §§ 129b and 2004 as follows: three
public members and two each of individuals licensed as an Early Childhood
Educator I, Early Childhood Educator II, and Early Childhood Educator III
pursuant to this chapter. All members shall be Vermont residents. The
members who are early childhood educators shall have been in active practice
in Vermont for not less than the preceding three years and shall be in active
practice during their incumbency. The public members shall be persons who
have no financial interest personally or through a spouse, parent, child, or
sibling in the activities regulated under this chapter, other than as consumers or
possible consumers of its services. Appointments shall be made without
regard to political affiliation and on the basis of integrity and demonstrated
ability.
(c) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as initial appointments.
VT LEG #379294 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.182
2025 Page 3 of 13
(d) Board members shall not serve more than two consecutive terms.
§ 6212. BOARD PROCEDURES
(a) Annually, the Board shall meet to elect a chair, vice chair, and a
secretary.
(b) Meetings shall be warned and conducted in accordance with 1 V.S.A.
chapter 5.
(d) A majority of the members of the Board shall constitute a quorum.
(e) All business may be transacted by a majority vote of the members
present and voting, unless otherwise provided by statute.
§ 6213. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE BOARD
(a) The Board shall:
(1) adopt rules, pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, that are necessary for
the performance of its duties in accordance with this chapter, including
activities that must be completed by an applicant in order to fulfill the
educational and experiential requirements established by this chapter;
(2) provide general information to applicants for licensure as early
childhood educators;
(3) explain appeal procedures to licensees and applicants and complaint
procedures to the public; and
(4) use the administrative and legal services provided by the Office of
Professional Regulation under 3 V.S.A. chapter 5.
VT LEG #379294 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.182
2025 Page 4 of 13
(b) The Board may conduct hearings as provided in 3 V.S.A. chapter 5.
Sec. 3. 26 V.S.A. chapter 111 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 111. EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATORS
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 6201. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Board” means the Vermont Board of Early Childhood Educators.
(2) “Early childhood educator” means an individual licensed to provide
early childhood education pursuant to section 6202 of this section.
(3) “Guidance” means direct or indirect consultative support in which an
Early Childhood Educator III provides feedback to an Early Childhood
Educator II.
(4) “Supervision” means on-site, direct oversight in which an Early
Childhood Educator II or III observes the practice of an Early Childhood
Educator I and provides feedback, support, and direction to an Early Childhood
Educator I.
§ 6202. SCOPE OF PRACTICE
(a)(1) An early childhood educator licensed pursuant to this chapter shall
provide care and educational instruction to children from birth through eight
years of age in a variety of settings, including:
VT LEG #379294 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.182
2025 Page 5 of 13
(A) planning and implementing intentional, developmentally
appropriate learning experiences that promote the social-emotional, physical,
language, and cognitive development and health of each child served;
(B) establishing and maintaining a safe, caring, inclusive, and healthy
learning environment;
(C) observing, documenting, and assessing children’s learning and
development;
(D) developing reciprocal, culturally responsive relationships with
families and communities; and
(E) engaging in reflective practice and continuous learning.
(2) An early childhood educator pursuant to this chapter does not
include exempt teachers licensed under 16 V.S.A. chapter 51 by the Agency of
Education with an early childhood endorsement, as provided in section 6204 of
this chapter.
(b) An early childhood educator licensed shall have the following
responsibilities as determined by license type:
(1) Early Childhood Educator I shall be authorized to serve on an early
childhood education team for children birth through eight years of age in any
setting under the supervision of an Early Childhood Educator II or III or
teacher licensed under 16 V.S.A. chapter 51 by the Agency of Education with
an early childhood education endorsement.
VT LEG #379294 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.182
2025 Page 6 of 13
(2) Early Childhood Educator II, in addition to the responsibilities and
authorities of an Early Childhood Educator I, shall be authorized to:
(A) in a nonpublic education setting for children from birth through
five years of age, serve in a lead educator role in a family child care home as
defined in 33 V.S.A. § 3511 or a center-based child care and preschool
program as defined by the Department for Children and Families in rule,
providing supervision to individuals licensed as an Early Childhood Educator I
and receiving guidance from individuals licensed as an Early Childhood
Educator III; or
(B) in a public education setting for children in prekindergarten
through grade three, serve in a support role.
(3) Early Childhood Educator III, in addition to the responsibilities and
authorities of an Early Childhood Educator I and II, shall be authorized to:
(A) in a nonpublic education setting for children from birth through
eight years of age, serve in a lead educator role in a family child care home as
defined in 33 V.S.A. § 3511 or a center-based child care and preschool
program as defined by the Department for Children and Families in rule,
providing supervision to individuals licensed as an Early Childhood Educator I
and guidance to individuals licensed as an Early Childhood Educator II; or
(B) in a public education setting for children in prekindergarten
through grade three, serve in a support role.
VT LEG #379294 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.182
2025 Page 7 of 13
(c) An early childhood educator licensed pursuant to this chapter shall
serve in a supporting role in the provision of prekindergarten services provided
in accordance with 16 V.S.A. § 829.
§ 6203. PROHIBITIONS
(a) An individual shall not hold themselves out as an early childhood
educator in this State unless the individual is licensed under this chapter or
exempt from this chapter pursuant to section 6204 of this chapter.
(b) An individual shall not use in connection with the individual’s name
any letters, words, or insignia indicating that the individual is an early
childhood educator unless the individual is licensed under this chapter or
exempt from this chapter pursuant to section 6204 of this chapter.
§ 6204. EXEMPTIONS
(a) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the following persons
acting within the scope of their respective professional practices:
(1) a teacher licensed under 16 V.S.A. chapter 51 by the Agency of
Education with an early childhood education endorsement; and
(2) an individual who provides consultation services in this State,
performs research, or participates in or instructs regular or continuing
education courses, provided the individual does not otherwise practice in this
State.
VT LEG #379294 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.182
2025 Page 8 of 13
(b) This chapter shall not be construed to limit or restrict in any manner the
right of a practitioner of another profession or occupation from carrying on in
the usual manner any of the functions incidental to that profession or
occupation.
Subchapter 2. Board of Early Childhood Educators
* * *
Subchapter 3. Licensure Requirements
§ 6221. QUALIFICATIONS
(a) To qualify for licensure as an early childhood educator in this State, an
applicant shall have attained the age of majority and shall have a high school
diploma or successful completion of a General Education Development (GED)
test or an equivalent credential. An applicant shall have additional education
and experience in accordance with this subsection for each of the following
license types:
(1) Early Childhood Educator I shall have completed an approved
certificate or credential program in early childhood education requiring a
minimum of 120 hours and field experience.
(2) Early Childhood Educator II shall have completed an approved
associate’s degree program in early childhood education:
(A) requiring a minimum of 60 college credits and field experience;
and
VT LEG #379294 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.182
2025 Page 9 of 13
(B) offering college credit based upon an assessment of the
individual’s competencies acquired through experience working in the
profession.
(3) Early Childhood Educator III shall have completed an approved
bachelor’s degree program in early childhood education requiring a minimum
of 120 college credits and field experience.
(b) In addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section,
applicants shall pass any examination that may be required by rule.
§ 6222. LICENSE RENEWAL
(a) Licenses shall be renewed every two years upon application and
payment of the required fee. Failure to comply with the provisions of this
section shall result in suspension of all privileges granted by the license
beginning on the expiration date of the license. A license that has lapsed shall
be reinstated upon payment of the biennial renewal fee and the late renewal
penalty pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 127.
(b) The Board may adopt rules necessary for the protection of the public to
assure the Board that an applicant whose license has lapsed for more than five
years is professionally qualified before reinstatement may occur. Conditions
imposed under this subsection shall be in addition to the requirements of
subsection (a) of this section.
VT LEG #379294 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.182
2025 Page 10 of 13
(c) In addition to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, an
applicant for renewal shall have satisfactorily completed continuing education
as required by the Board. For purposes of this subsection, the Board may
require, by rule, not more than 24 hours of approved continuing education as a
condition of renewal.
§ 6223. FEES
Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following
fees:
(1) Early Childhood Educator I:
(A) Application for initial license, $125.00.
(B) Biennial renewal, $225.00.
(2) Early Childhood Educator II:
(A) Application for initial license, $175.00.
(B) Biennial renewal, $250.00.
(3) Early Childhood Educator III:
(A) Application for initial license, $225.00.
(B) Biennial renewal, $275.00.
§ 6224. UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT
As used in this chapter, unprofessional conduct means:
VT LEG #379294 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.182
2025 Page 11 of 13
(1) conduct prohibited by this section, by 3 V.S.A. § 129a, or by other
statutes relating to early childhood education, whether or not that conduct is by
a licensee, an applicant, or an individual who later becomes an applicant; or
(2) conduct that results in a licensee, applicant, or an individual who
later becomes an applicant being placed on the Child Protection Registry
pursuant to 33 V.S.A. chapter 49.
§ 6225. VARIANCES; TRANSITIONAL LICENSURE
(a) The Board shall issue a transitional Early Childhood Educator II and III
license to a teacher or director operating a registered or licensed family child
care home or licensed center-based child care and preschool program and who
does not meet the educational and experiential licensure requirements in this
chapter. Transitional licenses shall be valid for a two-year period and shall be
renewed by the Board for an additional two-year period with satisfactory
supporting documentation of the individual’s ongoing work to obtain the
required educational and experiential qualifications for licensure under this
chapter.
(b) At the conclusion of two two-year transitional licensure periods, the
Board, at its discretion, may issue one final two-year transitional license if the
licensee can demonstrate extenuating circumstances for not having attained the
educational and experiential requirements in this chapter and ongoing work to
attain these requirements.
VT LEG #379294 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.182
2025 Page 12 of 13
Sec. 4. REPEAL; TRANSITIONAL LICENSE
26 V.S.A. § 6225 (variances; transitional licensure) is repealed on July 1,
2033.
Sec. 5. 33 V.S.A. § 3511 is amended to read:
§ 3511. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(3) “Child care provider” means a person program licensed or registered
by the Department for Children and Families, or authorized by the Department,
to provide child care.
* * *
Sec. 6. OFFICE OF PROFESSIONAL REGULATION; LICENSURE OF
EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATORS; APPROPRIATION
(a) The establishment of the following five new permanent positions is
authorized in the Office of Professional Regulation in fiscal year 2027:
(1) one full-time, classified executive officer for the Vermont Board of
Early Childhood Educators;
(2) one full-time, classified licensing staff;
(3) one full-time, classified enforcement staff;
(4) one full-time, exempt general counsel; and
(5) one full-time, classified administrative staff.
VT LEG #379294 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.182
2025 Page 13 of 13
(b) In fiscal year 2026, the amount of $1,400,000.00 is appropriated from
the General Fund to the Office of Professional Regulation to be used for the
licensure of early childhood educators in accordance with this act.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section, Sec. 1 (Office of Professional Regulation), Sec. 2
(Vermont Board of Early Childhood Educators), and Sec. 6 (Office of
Professional Regulation; licensure of early childhood educators; appropriation)
shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
(b) Sec. 3 (early childhood educators), Sec. 4 (repeal; transitional license),
and Sec. 5 (definitions) shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
VT LEG #379294 v.3